North Dakota, session 69, HB1402.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Subsection 3 of section 54-44-04.6 of the North Dakota
Century Code is amended and reenacted as follows:
3. Surplus property must be transferred at fair market value to state agencies, political
subdivisions, and nonprofit organizations eligible to receive federal surplus property
under the Federal Property Administrative Services Act of 1949, as amended. Eligible
organizations must be notified of the availability of property on a regular basis. Surplus
motor vehicles must be made available first, for fourteen days, to political subdivisions
for purchase at a cost of thirty percent less than fair market value.
Page No. 1 25.0870.01000